District of Columbia statutes.
24-276.04

Notice requirements.

The Administrator shall provide notice of the requirements of this subchapter to:

(1)

The relevant staff at the place of confinement, including:

(A)

All medical staff;

(B)

Staff and contractors who are involved in the transport of confined women of child-bearing age; and

(C)

Other staff as the Administrator deems appropriate; and

(2)

All women who are in their third trimester of pregnancy at the time the place of confinement takes custody of the person.

History

July 25, 2015, D.C. Law 20-280, § 204, 62 DCR 1495